District of Columbia statutes.
49-507

Witnesses; compulsory attendance.

Every person not belonging to the National Guard of the District of Columbia who, being duly subpoenaed to appear as a witness before the military courts herein provided for, willfully neglects or refuses to appear, or refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or produce documentary evidence which such person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, for which such person shall be punished on information in the criminal courts of the District of Columbia, and it shall be the duty of the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, on certification of the facts to him by any military court herein provided for, to file an information against and prosecute the person so offending and the punishment of such person on conviction shall be by a fine of not more than $100, or imprisonment not exceeding 30 days, or both, at the discretion of the court; provided, that this section shall not apply to persons residing beyond the limits of the District of Columbia, and that the fees of such witness and his mileage at the rate provided for witnesses in the United States District Court in said District shall be duly paid or tendered said witness; and provided, that no witness shall be compelled to incriminate himself or to answer any questions which may tend to criminate or degrade him.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 635, ch. 146, § 60
1981 Ed., § 39-807.
1973 Ed., § 39-707.